sms/test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-suekkj_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - sueʹǩǩ: # Noun a-stem 'birch/koivu' - full paradigm
# cf. Sammallahti, Pekka 2012: 150
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Nom: suẹʹǩǩ
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Gen: suẹʹjj
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Acc: suẹʹjj
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Ill: suäkˈka
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Loc: suẹʹjjest
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Com: sueʹjjin
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Ess: suẹʹǩǩen
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Par: suẹʹjjed
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Sg+Abe: [suẹʹjjtaa, suẹʹjjtää]
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Nom: suẹʹjj
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Gen: sueʹjji
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Acc: sueʹjjid
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Ill: sueʹjjid
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Loc: sueʹjjin
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Com: sueʹjjivuiʹm
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Pl+Abe: [sueʹjjitaa, sueʹjjitää]
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Nom: suäǥǥaž
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Gen: suäǥǥa
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Acc: suäǥǥa
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Ill: suäǥǥže
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Loc: suäǥǥast
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Com: suäǥǥain
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Abe: [suäǥǥataa, suäǥǥatää]
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Ess: suäǥǥžen
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Par: suäǥǥžed
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Nom: suäǥǥa
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Gen: suäǥǥai
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Acc: suäǥǥaid
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Ill: suäǥǥaid
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Loc: suäǥǥain
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Com: suäǥǥaivuiʹm
     sueʹǩǩ+N+Der/Dim+N+Pl+Abe: [suäǥǥaitaa, suäǥǥaitää]
